Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.050

Tampering with registration form or ballot declaration.

(1) A person who knowingly destroys, alters, defaces, conceals, or discards a completed voter registration form, signed ballot declaration, or voted ballot is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. This section does not apply to (a) the voter who completed the form or declaration, or (b) a county auditor who acts as authorized by law.

(2) Any person who intentionally fails to return another person's completed voter registration form, signed ballot declaration, or voted ballot to the proper state or county elections office by the applicable deadline is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2024 c 28 s 10; 2011 c 10 s 68; 2005 c 243 s 23.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.